District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.71

Effective dates.

(a)

Subchapters I and V, and parts A and G, and § 1-207.22 of subchapter VII shall take effect on December 24, 1973.

(b)

Sections 1-207.12, 1-207.13, 1-207.14, and 1-207.15 of subchapter VII, and section 1-204.01(b) of subchapter IV, and subchapter II shall take effect July 1, 1974, except that any provision thereof which in effect transfer authority to appoint any citizen member of the National Capital Planning Commission of the District of Columbia Redevelopment Land Agency shall take effect January 2, 1975.

(c)

Subchapter III and IV, except § 1-204.01(b) of subchapter IV, shall take effect January 2, 1975, if subchapter IV is accepted by a majority of the registered qualified electors in the District of Columbia voting on the charter issue in the charter referendum.

(d)

Subchapter VI and parts D and F and §§ 1-207.11, 1-207.16, 1-207.17, 1-207.18, 1-207.19, 1-207.21, and 1-207.23 of subchapter VII shall take effect only if and upon the date that subchapter IV becomes effective.

(e)

Part E of subchapter VII shall take effect on the date on which subchapter IV is accepted by a majority of the registered qualified electors in the District of Columbia voting on the charter issue in the charter referendum.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 779, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 771